Washington statutes.
RCW 4.84.130

Costs in appeals from district courts.

In all civil actions tried before the district court, in which an appeal shall be taken to the superior court, and the party appellant shall not recover a more favorable judgment in the superior court than before the district court, such appellant shall pay all costs.

[ 1987 c 202 s 122; Code 1881 s 518; 1877 p 110 s 522; 1854 p 203 s 380; RRS s 487.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

District court appeals: Chapter 12.36 RCW.